Mississippi, session 2026, SB2661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The board of supervisors of any county may, by resolution duly entered upon its minutes, authorize the county to participate in a group purchasing program operated by the Mississippi Association of Supervisors for the purchase of supplies, commodities and equipment, when it appears to the board of supervisors that participation in such group purchasing program would or could promote economy, efficiency or effectiveness in county operations. (2)  Any county that elects to participate in a group purchasing program operated by the Mississippi Association of Supervisors pursuant to this section may purchase supplies, commodities and equipment through such program, and purchases made in accordance with the requirements of the program shall be exempt from the provisions of Sections 31-7-9, 31-7-10, 31-7-11, 31-7-12 and 31-7-13. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.